Illinois, session 104th, HB1395.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Line of Duty Compensation Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 315/1)  (from Ch. 48, par. 281)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the the 8Line of Duty Compensation Act.9(Source: P.A. 93-1047, eff. 10-18-04.)